Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6296.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Athol may grant five (5) additional licenses for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk off the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138.  A 
license granted pursuant to this act shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 
17. 
SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect upon its passage.